Hawaii statutes.
[§155‑34]
Hawaii water infrastructure special fund. (a) There is established
the Hawaii water infrastructure special fund into which shall be deposited:

(1) Water infrastructure charges received for the use
and services of the loan program, including the repayment of loans made under
the loan program;

(2) All other funds received by the department and
legally available for the purposes of the water infrastructure special fund;

(3) Interest earnings on all amounts in the water
infrastructure special fund; and

(4) Any other moneys permitted by the board of
agriculture.

(b) Moneys in the water infrastructure special
fund may be used for the purposes of:

(1) Making water infrastructure loans;

(2) Paying administrative costs of the loan program;
or

(3) Paying any other costs related to the loan
program. [L 2016, c 171, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next